Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1566.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1857(a), (d) introductory paragraph and (e) and 1858(a), (d) introductory paragraph and (e) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1857. Cosmetology Training through Career and Technical Center [Pilot] Program.--(a) The Cosmetology Training Through Career And Technical Center [Pilot] Program is established in the State Board of Cosmetology.* * *(d) No later than [June 30, 2023] May 31, 2026, and each year thereafter [through June 30, 2025], each CTC and secondary 123456789101112131415161718192021 school participating in the [pilot] program shall report the following information to the State Board of Cosmetology on a form prescribed by the board:* * *[(e) The pilot program under this section shall expire three years from the effective date of this section.]* * *Section 1858. Barber Training through Career and Technical Center [Pilot] Program.--(a) The Barber Training Through Career and Technical Center [Pilot] Program is established in the State Board of Barber Examiners.* * *(d) No later than [June 30, 2023] May 31, 2026, and each year thereafter [through June 30, 2025], each CTC and secondary school participating in the [pilot] program shall report the following information to the State Board of Barber Examiners on a form prescribed by the board:* * *[(e) The pilot program under this section shall expire three years from the effective date of this section.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect June 30, 2025, or immediately, whichever occurs later.20250HB1566PN1851 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223